lt-LT: Baldai > Biuro baldų priedai > Darbo stočių ir kabinų priedai: Biuro pertvarų kabliukai ir kabyklos; Biuro pertvarų jungtys ir laikikliai; Kabinų plokštės; Kabinų lentynos; Stalų privatumo ir akustinės pertvaros
sk-SK: Nábytok > Príslušenstvo ku kancelárskemu nábytku > Príslušenstvo k pracovným staniciam: Háky a závesy do kancelárskych kútikov; Spojky a konzoly na kancelárske priečky; Panely do kancelárskych boxov; Police do skríň; Ochranné a akustické paravány na pracovisko
pt-BR: Móveis > Acessórios de mobiliário para escritório > Acessórios para estações de trabalho e cubículos: Ganchos e cabides para cubículos; Conectores e suportes para painéis de cubículo; Painéis de cubículo; Prateleiras para cubículos; Telas acústicas e de privacidade para mesas
el: Έπιπλα > Αξεσουάρ επίπλων γραφείου > Αξεσουάρ θέσεων εργασίας & διαχωριστικών γραφείου: Γάντζοι και κρεμάστρες για διαχωριστικά γραφείου; Σύνδεσμοι και στηρίγματα για διαχωριστικά γραφείου; Διαχωριστικά πάνελ γραφείου; Ράφια για διαχωριστικά γραφείου; Διαχωριστικά και ακουστικά πάνελ γραφείου
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Acessórios de mobiliário de escritório > Acessórios de estações de trabalho e cubículos: Ganchos e cabides de cubículos; Conetores e suportes de painéis para cubículos; Painéis de cubículos; Prateleiras de cubículos; Ecrãs de privacidade e acústicos para secretárias
pl: Meble > Akcesoria do mebli biurowych > Akcesoria do stanowisk pracy i boksów: Haczyki i wieszaki do boksów biurowych; Łączniki i wsporniki do paneli biurowych; Ścianki działowe boksów biurowych; Półki do boksów biurowych; Ekrany akustyczne i oddzielające na biurko
fr: Meubles > Accessoires pour meubles de bureau > Accessoires pour postes de travail: Crochets et supports pour cloisons de bureau; Connecteurs et supports pour cloisons de bureau; Cloisons de bureau; Étagères pour cloisons de bureau; Écrans de séparation et acoustiques pour bureaux
zh-CN: 家具 > 办公家具配件 > 办公隔断工作桌/办公位配件: 隔断挂钩和衣架; 隔断板连接件和支架; 隔断板; 隔断置物架; 办公桌隐私隔音屏
bg-BG: Мебели > Аксесоари за офис мебели > Аксесоари за работни станции и кабини: Куки и закачалки за офис прегради; Свързващи панели за офис кабини и скоби; Преградни панели за офис кабини; Рафтове за офис кабини; Панели за уединение и акустични прегради за бюра
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > อุปกรณ์เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำนักงาน > อุปกรณ์สถานีงานและคอกทำงาน: ตะขอและที่แขวนพาร์ทิชัน; ข้อต่อและโครงยึดแผงพาร์ทิชัน; แผงพาร์ทิชัน; ชั้นวางบนพาร์ทิชัน; ฉากกั้นโต๊ะกันเสียงและบังสายตา
ko: 가구 > 사무용 가구 부대용품 > 사무용 책상 부대용품: 큐비클 훅 및 행거; 큐비클 패널 커넥터 및 브래킷; 큐비클 패널; 큐비클 선반; 책상 프라이버시 및 방음 스크린
es: Mobiliario > Accesorios para mobiliario de oficina > Accesorios para cubículos y mesas de trabajo: Ganchos y colgadores para cubículos; Conectores y soportes para paneles de cubículos; Paneles para cubículos; Estantes para cubículos; Pantallas de privacidad y acústicas para escritorio
hr-HR: Namještaj > Pribor za uredski namještaj > Pribor za radne postaje i uredske odjeljke: Kuke i vješalice za uredski odjeljak; Konektori i nosači panela za uredski odjeljak; Paneli za uredski odjeljak; Police za uredski odjeljak; Pregrade za privatnost i akustične pregrade za stol
ru: Мебель > Аксессуары для офисной мебели > Аксессуары для рабочих мест и столов с перегородками: Крючки и вешалки для офисных перегородок; Соединители и кронштейны для офисных перегородок; Офисные перегородки; Полки для офисных перегородок; Настольные акустические экраны
de: Möbel > Zubehör für Büromöbel > Zubehör für Arbeitsplätze im Großraumbüro: Trennwand-Haken & Aufhänger; Stellwand-Verbinder & Halterungen; Büro-Trennwände; Trennwand-Regale; Sicht- & Akustikschutz-Trennwände
vi: Đồ gỗ > Phụ kiện nội thất văn phòng > Phụ kiện tủ và bàn làm việc: Móc treo vách ngăn văn phòng; Khớp nối & giá đỡ vách ngăn văn phòng; Vách ngăn văn phòng; Kệ vách ngăn văn phòng; Vách ngăn bàn làm việc cách âm & tạo sự riêng tư
cs: Nábytek > Příslušenství ke kancelářskému nábytku > Kancelářská pracoviště a kóje – příslušenství: Háčky a věšáky na přepážky; Spojky a držáky na kancelářské přepážky; Kancelářské přepážky; Police na přepážky; Dělicí a akustické panely na stůl
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Dodatki za pisarniško pohištvo > Dodatki za delovne postaje in kabine: Kavlji in obešalniki za pisarniške kotičke; Povezovalniki in nosilci za pisarniške kabine; Plošče za kabine; Police za kabine; Zasebnost na mizi in akustične pregrade
tr: Mobilyalar > Ofis Mobilyası Aksesuarları > Çalışma Odası ve Küçük Oda Aksesuarları: Bölme paneli askıları ve kancaları; Bölme panel bağlantı elemanları ve braketleri; Ofis bölme panelleri; Bölme paneli rafları; Masaüstü gizlilik ve akustik paneller
nl: Meubelen > Accessoires voor kantoormeubilair > Accessoires voor werkplekken en -cellen: Cubiclehaken en -hangers; Cubicle-paneelverbinders en -beugels; Cubicle-panelen; Cubicleplanken; Privacy- en akoestische bureauschermen
it: Arredamento > Accessori per arredamento da ufficio > Accessori per postazioni da lavoro: Ganci e appendini per cubicoli; Connettori e staffe per pannelli cubicoli; Pannelli per cubicoli; Mensole per cubicoli; Pannelli fonoassorbenti e divisori da scrivania
sv: Möbler > Tillbehör till kontorsmöbler > Tillbehör till arbetsstationer och kontorsbås: Krokar & hängare för kontorsbås; Panelkopplingar & fästen för kontorsbås; Paneler för kontorsbås; Hyllor för kontorsbås; Skärmväggar & bordsskärmar
nb: Møbler > Tilbehør til kontormøbler > Tilbehør til arbeidsstasjoner: Kroker og knagger for skillevegger; Koblinger og braketter for skillevegger; Skillevegger for kontor; Hyller for skillevegger; Skjermvegger og bordskjermer
hu: Bútor > Irodabútor-kiegészítők > Munkaállomás- és fülkekiegészítők: Paravánra szerelhető kampók és akasztók; Irodai paraván csatlakozók és konzolok; Irodai paravánok; Paravánra szerelhető polcok; Asztali térelválasztók és akusztikus panelek
ja: 家具 > オフィス家具関連用品 > パーティション・間仕切り関連用品: パーティションフック・ハンガー; パーティションパネルコネクタ・ブラケット; パーティションパネル; パーティションシェルフ; デスク用プライバシー・防音スクリーン
en: Furniture > Office Furniture Accessories > Workstation & Cubicle Accessories: Cubicle Hooks & Hangers; Cubicle Panel Connectors & Brackets; Cubicle Panels; Cubicle Shelves; Desk Privacy & Acoustic Screens
fi: Huonekalut > Toimistokalustetarvikkeet > Työasemien ja toimistokoppien tarvikkeet: Työpisteiden koukut ja ripustimet; Työpisteiden sermien kiinnikkeet; Työpisteiden sermit; Työpisteiden hyllyt; Työpöytien sermit ja akustiikkalevyt
da: Møbler > Tilbehør til kontormøbler > Arbejdssted – tilbehør: Kroge og bøjler til skillevægge; Forbindelsesled og beslag til skillevægge; Skillevægge til kontor; Hylder til skillevægge; Afskærmning og akustikskærme til skriveborde
zh-TW: 家具 > 辦公家具配件 > 辦公室隔間屏風配件: 辦公隔間掛鉤與掛架; 辦公隔板連接器與支架; 辦公隔板; 辦公隔間層架; 辦公桌隱私與隔音屏風
ro-RO: Mobilier > Accesorii pentru mobilier de birou > Accesorii pentru stații de lucru și nișe: Cârlige și umerașe pentru birouri tip cabină; Conectori și suporturi pentru panouri de cabină; Panouri pentru cabine; Rafturi pentru cabine; Ecrane de intimitate și acustice pentru birou